n11.dix
<pardef n="heVMgas/u_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>u</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>aru</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>annu</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>arannu</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>iniMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ariMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>igeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>igAgi</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>igoskara</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>arigeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>arigAgi</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>arigoskara</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ina deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ara deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>iniMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ariMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ina</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ara</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>inalli</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>aralli</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>e</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>are</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ma/galYu_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>kkalYu</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>kkalYannu</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>lYiMxa</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>kkalYiMxa</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>akkalYigeV</l>
				<r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>akkalYigAgi</l>
				<r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>akkalYigoskara</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>kkalYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>akkalYiMxa</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>kkalYa</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>makkalYalli</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>galYe</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>kkalYe</l>
                <r>galYu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="heVMgasu"><i>heVMgas</i><par n="heVMgas/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="madiheVMgasu"><i>madiheVMgas</i><par n="heVMgas/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="magalYu"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/galYu_n"/></e>
<e lm="maxumagalYu"><i>maxuma</i><par n="ma/galYu_n"/></e>
<e lm="malamagalYu"><i>malama</i><par n="ma/galYu_n"/></e>
<e lm="moVmmagalYu"><i>moVmma</i><par n="ma/galYu_n"/></e>
<e lm="heVmmagalYu"><i>heVmma</i><par n="ma/galYu_n"/></e>
